ca/dictionaries/ca-valencia.aff
FLAG long
# Model de conjugació: lligar
SFX 0D Y 84
SFX 0D r r/_v_Y_C ar
SFX 0D r nt/_v_Y_C ar
SFX 0D r t/_v_Y ar
SFX 0D r da/_Y ar
SFX 0D r ts/_Y ar
SFX 0D r des/_Y ar
SFX 0D ar o/_Z ar
SFX 0D ar ue/_Z ar
SFX 0D gar c/_Z ar
SFX 0D ar ues/_Z ar
SFX 0D r 0/_Z ar
SFX 0D ar uem/_Z ar
SFX 0D r m/_Z ar
SFX 0D ar ueu/_Z ar
SFX 0D r u/_Z ar
SFX 0D ar uen/_Z ar
SFX 0D r va/_Z ar
SFX 0D r ves/_Z ar
SFX 0D r va/_Z ar
SFX 0D ar àvem/_Z ar
SFX 0D ar àveu/_Z ar
SFX 0D r ven/_Z ar
SFX 0D ar uí/_Z ar
SFX 0D r res/_Z ar
SFX 0D ar à/_Z ar
SFX 0D ar àrem/_Z ar
SFX 0D ar àreu/_Z ar
SFX 0D r ren/_Z ar
SFX 0D r ré/_Z ar
SFX 0D r ràs/_Z ar
SFX 0D r rà/_Z ar
SFX 0D r rem/_Z ar
SFX 0D r reu/_Z ar
SFX 0D r ran/_Z ar
SFX 0D r ria/_Z ar
SFX 0D r ries/_Z ar
SFX 0D r ria/_Z ar
SFX 0D r ríem/_Z ar
SFX 0D r ríeu/_Z ar
SFX 0D r rien/_Z ar
SFX 0D ar ue/_Z ar
SFX 0D ar ui/_Z ar
SFX 0D ar ues/_Z ar
SFX 0D ar uis/_Z ar
SFX 0D ar ue/_Z ar
SFX 0D ar ui/_Z ar
SFX 0D ar uem/_Z ar
SFX 0D ar ueu/_Z ar
SFX 0D ar uen/_Z ar
SFX 0D ar uin/_Z ar
SFX 0D ar ués/_Z ar
SFX 0D r ra/_Z ar
SFX 0D ar às/_Z ar
SFX 0D ar uessis/_Z ar
SFX 0D r res/_Z ar
SFX 0D r ssis/_Z ar
SFX 0D ar uesses/_Z ar
SFX 0D r sses/_Z ar
SFX 0D ar ués/_Z ar
SFX 0D r ra/_Z ar
SFX 0D ar às/_Z ar
SFX 0D ar uéssim/_Z ar
SFX 0D ar àrem/_Z ar
SFX 0D ar àssim/_Z ar
SFX 0D ar uéssem/_Z ar
SFX 0D ar àssem/_Z ar
SFX 0D ar uéssiu/_Z ar
SFX 0D ar àreu/_Z ar
SFX 0D ar àssiu/_Z ar
SFX 0D ar uésseu/_Z ar
SFX 0D ar àsseu/_Z ar
SFX 0D ar uessin/_Z ar
SFX 0D r ren/_Z ar
SFX 0D r ssin/_Z ar
SFX 0D ar uessen/_Z ar
SFX 0D r ssen/_Z ar
SFX 0D r 0/_D ar
SFX 0D ar ue/_D ar
SFX 0D ar ui/_D ar
SFX 0D ar uem/_C ar
SFX 0D r u/_C ar
SFX 0D ar ueu/_C ar
SFX 0D ar uen/_C ar
SFX 0D ar uin/_C ar

# Model de conjugació: lloar
SFX 0E Y 84
SFX 0E r r/_v_Y_C ar
SFX 0E r nt/_v_Y_C ar
SFX 0E r t/_v_Y ar
SFX 0E r da/_Y ar
SFX 0E r ts/_Y ar
SFX 0E r des/_Y ar
SFX 0E ar o/_Z ar
SFX 0E ar e/_Z ar
SFX 0E ar u/_Z ar
SFX 0E ar es/_Z ar
SFX 0E r 0/_Z ar
SFX 0E ar em/_Z ar
SFX 0E r m/_Z ar
SFX 0E ar eu/_Z ar
SFX 0E r u/_Z ar
SFX 0E ar en/_Z ar
SFX 0E r va/_Z ar
SFX 0E r ves/_Z ar
SFX 0E r va/_Z ar
SFX 0E ar àvem/_Z ar
SFX 0E ar àveu/_Z ar
SFX 0E r ven/_Z ar
SFX 0E ar í/_Z ar
SFX 0E r res/_Z ar
SFX 0E ar à/_Z ar
SFX 0E ar àrem/_Z ar
SFX 0E ar àreu/_Z ar
SFX 0E r ren/_Z ar
SFX 0E r ré/_Z ar
SFX 0E r ràs/_Z ar
SFX 0E r rà/_Z ar
SFX 0E r rem/_Z ar
SFX 0E r reu/_Z ar
SFX 0E r ran/_Z ar
SFX 0E r ria/_Z ar
SFX 0E r ries/_Z ar
SFX 0E r ria/_Z ar
SFX 0E r ríem/_Z ar
SFX 0E r ríeu/_Z ar
SFX 0E r rien/_Z ar
SFX 0E ar e/_Z ar
SFX 0E ar ï/_Z ar
SFX 0E ar es/_Z ar
SFX 0E ar ïs/_Z ar
SFX 0E ar e/_Z ar
SFX 0E ar ï/_Z ar
SFX 0E ar em/_Z ar
SFX 0E ar eu/_Z ar
SFX 0E ar en/_Z ar
SFX 0E ar ïn/_Z ar
SFX 0E ar és/_Z ar
SFX 0E r ra/_Z ar
SFX 0E ar às/_Z ar
SFX 0E ar essis/_Z ar
SFX 0E r res/_Z ar
SFX 0E r ssis/_Z ar
SFX 0E ar esses/_Z ar
SFX 0E r sses/_Z ar
SFX 0E ar és/_Z ar
SFX 0E r ra/_Z ar
SFX 0E ar às/_Z ar
SFX 0E ar éssim/_Z ar
SFX 0E ar àrem/_Z ar
SFX 0E ar àssim/_Z ar
SFX 0E ar éssem/_Z ar
SFX 0E ar àssem/_Z ar
SFX 0E ar éssiu/_Z ar
SFX 0E ar àreu/_Z ar
SFX 0E ar àssiu/_Z ar
SFX 0E ar ésseu/_Z ar
SFX 0E ar àsseu/_Z ar
SFX 0E ar essin/_Z ar
SFX 0E r ren/_Z ar
SFX 0E r ssin/_Z ar
SFX 0E ar essen/_Z ar
SFX 0E r ssen/_Z ar
SFX 0E r 0/_D ar
SFX 0E ar e/_D ar
SFX 0E ar ï/_D ar
SFX 0E ar em/_C ar
SFX 0E r u/_C ar
SFX 0E ar eu/_C ar
SFX 0E ar en/_C ar
SFX 0E ar ïn/_C ar

# Model de conjugació: menjar
SFX 0F Y 84
SFX 0F r r/_v_Y_C ar
SFX 0F r nt/_v_Y_C ar
SFX 0F r t/_v_Y ar
SFX 0F r da/_Y ar
SFX 0F r ts/_Y ar
SFX 0F r des/_Y ar
SFX 0F ar o/_Z ar
SFX 0F jar ge/_Z ar
SFX 0F ar 0/_Z ar
SFX 0F jar ges/_Z ar
SFX 0F r 0/_Z ar
SFX 0F jar gem/_Z ar
SFX 0F r m/_Z ar
SFX 0F jar geu/_Z ar
SFX 0F r u/_Z ar
SFX 0F jar gen/_Z ar
SFX 0F r va/_Z ar
SFX 0F r ves/_Z ar
SFX 0F r va/_Z ar
SFX 0F ar àvem/_Z ar
SFX 0F ar àveu/_Z ar
SFX 0F r ven/_Z ar
SFX 0F jar gí/_Z ar
SFX 0F r res/_Z ar
SFX 0F ar à/_Z ar
SFX 0F ar àrem/_Z ar
SFX 0F ar àreu/_Z ar
SFX 0F r ren/_Z ar
SFX 0F r ré/_Z ar
SFX 0F r ràs/_Z ar
SFX 0F r rà/_Z ar
SFX 0F r rem/_Z ar
SFX 0F r reu/_Z ar
SFX 0F r ran/_Z ar
SFX 0F r ria/_Z ar
SFX 0F r ries/_Z ar
SFX 0F r ria/_Z ar
SFX 0F r ríem/_Z ar
SFX 0F r ríeu/_Z ar
SFX 0F r rien/_Z ar
SFX 0F jar ge/_Z ar
SFX 0F jar gi/_Z ar
SFX 0F jar ges/_Z ar
SFX 0F jar gis/_Z ar
SFX 0F jar ge/_Z ar
SFX 0F jar gi/_Z ar
SFX 0F jar gem/_Z ar
SFX 0F jar geu/_Z ar
SFX 0F jar gen/_Z ar
SFX 0F jar gin/_Z ar
SFX 0F jar gés/_Z ar
SFX 0F r ra/_Z ar
SFX 0F ar às/_Z ar
SFX 0F jar gessis/_Z ar
SFX 0F r res/_Z ar
SFX 0F r ssis/_Z ar
SFX 0F jar gesses/_Z ar
SFX 0F r sses/_Z ar
SFX 0F jar gés/_Z ar
SFX 0F r ra/_Z ar
SFX 0F ar às/_Z ar
SFX 0F jar géssim/_Z ar
SFX 0F ar àrem/_Z ar
SFX 0F ar àssim/_Z ar
SFX 0F jar géssem/_Z ar
SFX 0F ar àssem/_Z ar
SFX 0F jar géssiu/_Z ar
SFX 0F ar àreu/_Z ar
SFX 0F ar àssiu/_Z ar
SFX 0F jar gésseu/_Z ar
SFX 0F ar àsseu/_Z ar
SFX 0F jar gessin/_Z ar
SFX 0F r ren/_Z ar
SFX 0F r ssin/_Z ar
SFX 0F jar gessen/_Z ar
SFX 0F r ssen/_Z ar
SFX 0F r 0/_D ar
SFX 0F jar ge/_D ar
SFX 0F jar gi/_D ar
SFX 0F jar gem/_C ar
SFX 0F r u/_C ar
SFX 0F jar geu/_C ar
SFX 0F jar gen/_C ar
SFX 0F jar gin/_C ar

# Model de conjugació: ofrenar
SFX 10 Y 84
SFX 10 r r/_v_Y_C ar
SFX 10 r nt/_v_Y_C ar
SFX 10 r t/_v_Y ar
SFX 10 r da/_Y ar
SFX 10 r ts/_Y ar
SFX 10 r des/_Y ar
SFX 10 ar o/_Z ar
SFX 10 ar e/_Z ar
SFX 10 enar èn/_Z ar
SFX 10 ar es/_Z ar
SFX 10 r 0/_Z ar
SFX 10 ar em/_Z ar
SFX 10 r m/_Z ar
SFX 10 ar eu/_Z ar
SFX 10 r u/_Z ar
SFX 10 ar en/_Z ar
SFX 10 r va/_Z ar
SFX 10 r ves/_Z ar
SFX 10 r va/_Z ar
SFX 10 ar àvem/_Z ar
SFX 10 ar àveu/_Z ar
SFX 10 r ven/_Z ar
SFX 10 ar í/_Z ar
SFX 10 r res/_Z ar
SFX 10 ar à/_Z ar
SFX 10 ar àrem/_Z ar
SFX 10 ar àreu/_Z ar
SFX 10 r ren/_Z ar
SFX 10 r ré/_Z ar
SFX 10 r ràs/_Z ar
SFX 10 r rà/_Z ar
SFX 10 r rem/_Z ar
SFX 10 r reu/_Z ar
SFX 10 r ran/_Z ar
SFX 10 r ria/_Z ar
SFX 10 r ries/_Z ar
SFX 10 r ria/_Z ar
SFX 10 r ríem/_Z ar
SFX 10 r ríeu/_Z ar
SFX 10 r rien/_Z ar
SFX 10 ar e/_Z ar
SFX 10 ar i/_Z ar
SFX 10 ar es/_Z ar
SFX 10 ar is/_Z ar
SFX 10 ar e/_Z ar
SFX 10 ar i/_Z ar
SFX 10 ar em/_Z ar
SFX 10 ar eu/_Z ar
SFX 10 ar en/_Z ar
SFX 10 ar in/_Z ar
SFX 10 ar és/_Z ar
SFX 10 r ra/_Z ar
SFX 10 ar às/_Z ar
SFX 10 ar essis/_Z ar
SFX 10 r res/_Z ar
SFX 10 r ssis/_Z ar
SFX 10 ar esses/_Z ar
SFX 10 r sses/_Z ar
SFX 10 ar és/_Z ar
SFX 10 r ra/_Z ar
SFX 10 ar às/_Z ar
SFX 10 ar éssim/_Z ar
SFX 10 ar àrem/_Z ar
SFX 10 ar àssim/_Z ar
SFX 10 ar éssem/_Z ar
SFX 10 ar àssem/_Z ar
SFX 10 ar éssiu/_Z ar
SFX 10 ar àreu/_Z ar
SFX 10 ar àssiu/_Z ar
SFX 10 ar ésseu/_Z ar
SFX 10 ar àsseu/_Z ar
SFX 10 ar essin/_Z ar
SFX 10 r ren/_Z ar
SFX 10 r ssin/_Z ar
SFX 10 ar essen/_Z ar
SFX 10 r ssen/_Z ar
SFX 10 r 0/_D ar
SFX 10 ar e/_D ar
SFX 10 ar i/_D ar
SFX 10 ar em/_C ar
SFX 10 r u/_C ar
SFX 10 ar eu/_C ar
SFX 10 ar en/_C ar
SFX 10 ar in/_C ar
